Utah statutes.
11-17-7.   Disposition of proceeds of bonds.
The proceeds from the sale of any bonds issued under this act shall be applied
only for the purposes for which the bonds were issued; but any accrued
interest and premium received upon any such sale shall be applied to the
payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds sold, and if for any
reason any portion of such proceeds are not needed for the purposes for which
the bonds were issued, then such unneeded portion of such proceeds shall be
applied to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds or in
accordance with such other plan or device for the furtherance of the project
and the protection of the bondholder as the governing body shall deem
appropriate under the circumstances.
